Utah statutes.
53A-8a-701.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "District administrator" means an individual who:

(a)  serves in a position that requires an educator license with an administrative area of concentration, except as provided in Section 53A-3-301 or 53A-6-110; and

(b)  supervises school administrators.

(2)  "School administrator" means an individual who:

(a)  serves in a position that requires an educator license with an administrative area of concentration, except as provided in Section 53A-6-110; and

(b)  supervises teachers.



Enacted by Chapter 425, 2012 General Session

